Hawaii statutes.
[§658B-3] Variation by agreement. (a)
The effect of provisions of this chapter may be varied by agreement of the
parties made at any time before or after commencement of an action,
commencement of a distribution proceeding, or the entry of judgment.

(b) The parties may agree upon the money to be
used in a transaction giving rise to a foreign-money claim and may use
different moneys for different aspects of the transaction. Stating the price
in a foreign money or for a particular transaction does not, of itself, require
the use of that money for other aspects of the transaction. [L 1990, c 50, pt
of §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next